Tennessee statutes. Title 48 Securities, Corporations And Associations
Part 6

Dissolution and Winding Up of the LLC

48-249-601. Dissolution.

Events causing dissolution. An LLC is dissolved upon the first to occur of the following:

If a period is fixed in the articles for the duration of the LLC, upon the expiration of that period, except that, in the case of an LLC that is administratively dissolved pursuant to § 48-249-604 by reason of the expiration of that period of duration, the LLC may be reinstated pursuant to § 48-249-606;

The occurrence of an event specified in the LLC documents;

An action of the members in accordance with § 48-249-603;

An action of the organizers under § 48-249-602;

An order of a court under § 48-249-616 or 48-249-617;

An action of the secretary of state under § 48-249-605; or

At any time there are no members if:

The LLC files a notice of dissolution as provided in § 48-249-609, within ninety (90) days after the occurrence of the event that terminated the membership interest of the last remaining member, which notice of dissolution may be signed on behalf of the LLC by the personal representative of the last remaining member; and

The LLC documents specify that the termination of the membership interest of the last remaining member dissolves the LLC; provided, that if such notice of dissolution is not filed or the LLC documents do not provide for dissolution in that event, the LLC is not dissolved and is not required to be wound up and the personal representative of the last remaining member is automatically substituted as a member for the last remaining member, effective as of the occurrence of the event that terminated the membership interest of the last remaining member. Notwithstanding this subdivision (a)(7)(B), the LLC documents may specify that any person may be substituted as a member for the last remaining member, effective as of the date of the event that causes the termination of membership interest of the last remaining member.

Events not causing dissolution. The termination, dissociation, death, incapacity, withdrawal, retirement, resignation, expulsion, bankruptcy or dissolution of any member, or the occurrence of any other event that terminates the membership interest of any member, shall not cause the LLC to be dissolved or its affairs to be wound up, and upon the occurrence of any such event, the LLC shall be continued without dissolution.

Effect of dissolution. An LLC dissolved by any of the dissolution events specified in subsection (a) shall be wound up, and its existence shall be terminated as provided in this part.

Acts 2005, ch. 286, § 1; 2006, ch. 620, § 34; 2016, ch. 688, § 9.

48-249-602. Nonjudicial termination by organizers.

Articles of termination. An LLC that has not accepted contributions may be dissolved and its existence terminated by the organizers, if a majority of the organizers sign and file articles of termination with the secretary of state containing:

The name of the LLC;

The date of formation of the LLC;

A statement that contributions have not been accepted by the LLC; and

A statement that no debts of the LLC remain unpaid.

The secretary of state shall file the articles of termination of the LLC if the secretary of state finds that the articles:

Comply with subsection (a); and

Are accompanied by a tax clearance for termination or withdrawal relative to such LLC.

When the articles of termination have been filed in accordance with subsection (b), the existence of the LLC is terminated.

Acts 2005, ch. 286, § 1; 2009, ch. 349, §§ 5, 6; 2010, ch. 741, § 38.

48-249-603. Nonjudicial dissolution by members.

Manner of dissolution. An LLC may be dissolved by the members:

Upon any event of dissolution set forth in the LLC documents or this chapter requiring member action;

By any procedures set forth in the LLC documents; or

By the members, when authorized in the manner set forth in this section.

Approval.

The proposed dissolution of the LLC shall be submitted for approval at a meeting of members. Notice, in accordance with this chapter and the LLC documents, shall be given to each member, whether or not entitled to vote at a meeting of members, and whether the meeting is a regular or a special meeting. Such notice shall state that a purpose of the meeting is to consider dissolving the LLC, and that dissolution shall be followed by the winding up and termination of the LLC.

If the proposed dissolution of the LLC is approved at a meeting of the members by a majority vote, or such other vote as may be provided for in the LLC documents, the LLC shall be dissolved and notice of dissolution shall be filed with the office of the secretary of state under § 48-249-609.

Acts 2005, ch. 286, § 1.

48-249-604. Grounds for administrative dissolution.

The secretary of state may commence a proceeding under § 48-249-605, to administratively dissolve the LLC, if:

The LLC does not deliver its properly completed annual report to the secretary of state within two (2) months after it is due;

The LLC is without a registered agent or registered office in this state for two (2) months or more;

The name of an LLC contained in a document filed under this chapter fails to comply with § 48-249-106;

The LLC does not notify the secretary of state within two (2) months that its registered agent or registered office has been changed, that its registered agent has resigned, or that its registered office has been discontinued;

The LLC submits to the secretary of state's office a check, bank draft, money order or other such instrument, for payment of any fee and it is dishonored upon presentation for payment;

A director, officer, manager, member or other representative of an LLC signed a document such person knew was false in any material respect, with the intent that the document be filed with the secretary of state; or

A period is fixed in the articles of organization for the duration of the LLC, upon the expiration of that period, but if no such period is set forth in the articles, then the LLC shall have a perpetual existence.

Acts 2005, ch. 286, § 1; 2016, ch. 688, § 10.

48-249-605. Procedure for and effect of administrative dissolution.

Notice of grounds. If the secretary of state determines that one (1) or more grounds exist under § 48-249-604 for dissolving an LLC, the secretary of state shall serve the LLC with written communication of the secretary of state's determination, in accordance with § 48-249-113(a), except that determination may be sent by first class mail.

Dissolution after notice. If the LLC does not correct each ground for administrative dissolution or demonstrate, to the reasonable satisfaction of the secretary of state, that each ground determined by the secretary of state does not exist, within two (2) months after the secretary of state's service of the communication of the determination in the same manner as is permitted under subsection (a), the secretary of state shall administratively dissolve the LLC, by signing a certificate of dissolution that recites the ground or grounds for dissolution and its effective date. The secretary of state shall file the original of the certificate and serve a copy on the LLC, in the same manner as is permitted under subsection (a).

Effect of administrative dissolution. An LLC that has been administratively dissolved continues its existence, but may not carry on any business except that necessary to wind up and liquidate its business and affairs under § 48-249-601 and notify claimants under § 48-249-611.

Effect on registered agent and registered office. The administrative dissolution of an LLC does not terminate the designation or authority of its registered agent or registered office.

Acts 2005, ch. 286, § 1.

48-249-606. Reinstatement following administrative dissolution.

Application for reinstatement. An LLC administratively dissolved under § 48-249-605 may apply to the secretary of state for reinstatement following administrative dissolution. The application shall:

Be accompanied by a confirmation of good standing relative to such LLC;

State the name of the LLC at its date of administrative dissolution;

State that the ground or grounds for dissolution either did not exist or have been eliminated; and

State a name for the LLC that satisfies the requirements of § 48-249-106.

Certificate of reinstatement.

If the secretary of state determines that the application is accompanied by the confirmation of good standing and contains the information required by subsection (a), and that such information is correct, then the secretary of state shall cancel the certificate of dissolution and prepare a certificate of reinstatement that recites the secretary of state's determination and the effective date of reinstatement, file the original of the certificate, and serve a copy on the LLC in accordance with § 48-249-113(a), except that the copy of the certificate may be sent by first class mail.

If the LLC name in subdivision (a)(4) is different than the LLC name in subdivision (a)(2), the application for reinstatement shall constitute an amendment to the articles of the LLC insofar as it pertains to the LLC's name.

Relation back of reinstatement. When the reinstatement is effective, it relates back to and takes effect as of the effective date of the administrative dissolution, and the LLC resumes carrying on its business as if the administrative dissolution had never occurred.

Acts 2005, ch. 286, § 1; 2010, ch. 741, §§ 39, 40; 2011, ch. 99, §§ 14-16.

48-249-607. Appeal from denial of reinstatement.

Notice of denial. If the secretary of state denies an LLC's application for reinstatement following administrative dissolution, the secretary of state shall serve the LLC, in accordance with § 48-249-113(a) with a written notice that explains the reason or reasons for denial.

Appeal procedure. The LLC may appeal the denial of reinstatement to the chancery court of Davidson County within thirty (30) days after service of the notice of denial. The LLC shall appeal by petitioning the court to set aside the dissolution and attaching to the petition copies of the secretary of state's certificate of dissolution, the LLC's application for reinstatement, and the secretary of state's notice of denial.

Order of reinstatement. The court may summarily order the secretary of state to reinstate the dissolved LLC, or may take other action the court considers appropriate.

Appeal of court decision. The court's final decision may be appealed as in other civil proceedings.

Acts 2005, ch. 286, § 1.

48-249-608. Articles of termination following administrative dissolution.

Submission of articles of termination. When an LLC that has been administratively dissolved wishes to terminate its existence, it may do so without first being reinstated, by delivering articles of termination to the secretary of state for filing following administrative dissolution, setting forth:

The name of the LLC;

The date that termination of the LLC existence was authorized;

That the resolution authorizing termination was duly adopted by the members;

A copy of the resolution or the written consent authorizing the termination; and

That all the assets of the LLC have been distributed to its creditors, members and holders.

The secretary of state shall file the articles of termination following administrative dissolution if the secretary of state finds that the articles:

Comply with subsection (a); and

Are accompanied by a tax clearance for termination or withdrawal relative to such LLC.

Upon such filing, the existence of the LLC shall cease, except that the termination of LLC existence shall not take away or impair any remedy to or against the LLC or its members, directors, managers or officers for any right or claim existing or any liability incurred, prior to such termination. Any such action or proceeding by or against the LLC may be prosecuted or defended by the LLC in its LLC name. The members, directors, managers or officers shall have the power to take such LLC or other action, as may be appropriate, to protect such remedy, right or claim.

Acts 2005, ch. 286, § 1; 2010, ch. 741, § 41.

48-249-609. Filing notice of dissolution and effect.

Notice of dissolution. If dissolution of the LLC is approved under § 48-249-603, or if it occurs under § 48-249-601(a)(2) or (a)(7), the LLC shall file a notice of dissolution with the secretary of state. The notice shall contain:

The name of the LLC; and

If the dissolution is approved under § 48-249-603(b), a statement that the requisite vote of the members was received, or that members validly took action without a meeting; or

If the dissolution occurs under § 48-249-601(a)(2) or (a)(7), a brief statement of the event that caused the dissolution and the date of that event.

Effect of dissolution. When the notice of dissolution has been filed with the secretary of state, the LLC shall cease to carry on its business, except to the extent necessary or appropriate for the winding up and termination of the business and affairs of the LLC. The members shall retain the right to revoke the dissolution in accordance with § 48-249-613, and the right to remove or appoint directors, managers or officers. The LLC's existence shall continue to the extent necessary to wind up the affairs of the LLC, until the dissolution is revoked or articles of termination are filed with the secretary of state.

Merger of dissolved LLC. As part of winding up, the LLC may participate in a merger under part 7 of this chapter, but the dissolved LLC shall not be the surviving entity.

Remedies preserved. The filing of a notice of dissolution with the secretary of state does not affect any remedy in favor of the LLC, or any remedy against it or its members, directors, managers or officers in those capacities, except as provided in § 48-249-611.

Acts 2005, ch. 286, § 1; 2016, ch. 688, § 11.

48-249-610. Procedure in winding up.

Winding up by merger. If the business of the LLC is wound up and terminated by the merger of the dissolved LLC into a surviving entity:

The procedures stated in § 48-249-702 shall be followed; and

Sections 48-249-609, 48-249-611, 48-249-612, 48-249-613 and 48-249-620 do not apply.

Winding up other than by merger. If the business of the LLC is to be wound up and terminated, other than by the merger of the dissolved LLC into a surviving entity, the procedures stated in subsections (c)-(e) shall be followed.

Debts of dissolved LLC. When a notice of dissolution has been filed with the secretary of state, the members of a member-managed LLC, the managers of a manager-managed LLC, or the board of directors of a director-managed LLC, as applicable, shall proceed as soon as possible to:

Collect, or make provision for the collection of, all known debts due or owing to the LLC, including unperformed contribution agreements; and

Except as provided in § 48-249-611, pay, or make provision for the payment of, all known debts, obligations, and liabilities of the LLC, according to their priorities under § 48-249-620.

Sale of assets. Notwithstanding § 48-249-705, when a notice of dissolution has been filed with the secretary of state, the managers of a manager-managed LLC or the board of directors of a director-managed LLC may sell, lease, transfer or otherwise dispose of all, or substantially all, of the property and assets of a dissolved LLC, without a vote of the members.

Distribution of remaining assets. All tangible or intangible property, including money, remaining after the discharge of the debts, obligations, and liabilities of the LLC shall be distributed to the members and holders of financial rights, in accordance with § 48-249-620, subject to § 48-249-305(d).

Acts 2005, ch. 286, § 1; 2006, ch. 620, § 35.

48-249-611. Known and unknown claims against LLC.

Notice to creditors. When a notice of dissolution has been filed with the secretary of state, and the business of the LLC is to be wound up and terminated by other than merger of the dissolved LLC into a successor entity under § 48-249-610(a), then the LLC may give notice of the filing to each creditor of, and claimant against, the LLC, known or unknown, present or future, and contingent or noncontingent, in accordance with subsections (b) and (c).

Disposition of known claims.

An LLC may dispose of the known claims against it by following the procedure described in this subsection (b).

The dissolved LLC shall notify its known claimants in writing of the dissolution, at any time after the effective date of the dissolution. The written notice shall:

Describe information that is required to be included in a claim;

State whether the claim is admitted or not admitted, and, if admitted:

The amount that is admitted, which may be as of a given date; and

Any interest obligation, if fixed by an instrument of indebtedness;

Provide a mailing address where a claim may be sent;

State the deadline, which may not be fewer than four (4) months from the effective date of the written notice, by which the dissolved LLC shall receive the claim; and

State that, except to the extent that any claim is admitted, the claim will be barred, if written notice of the claim is not received by the deadline.

A claim against the dissolved LLC is barred, to the extent that it is not admitted:

If the dissolved LLC delivered written notice to the claimant in accordance with subdivision (b)(2), and the claimant does not deliver a written notice of the claim to the dissolved LLC by the deadline; or

If the dissolved LLC delivered written notice to the claimant that the claimant's claim is rejected, in whole or in part, and the claimant does not commence a proceeding to enforce the claim within three (3) months from the effective date of the rejection notice.

For purposes of this subsection (b), “claim” does not include a contingent liability, or a claim based on an event occurring after the effective date of dissolution.

For purposes of this subsection (b), written notice is effective at the earliest of the following:

When received;

Five (5) days after its deposit in the United States mail, if mailed correctly addressed and with first class postage affixed;

On the date shown on the return receipt, if sent by registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, and the receipt is signed by or on behalf of the addressee; or

Twenty (20) days after deposit in the United States mail, as evidenced by the postmark, if mailed correctly addressed, and with other than first class, registered or certified postage affixed.

Notice by publication.

A dissolved LLC may also publish notice of its dissolution and request that persons with claims against the LLC present them in accordance with the notice.

The notice shall:

Be published one (1) time in a newspaper of general circulation in the county where the dissolved LLC's principal executive office is or was last located;

Describe the information that is required to be included in a claim and provide a mailing address where the claim may be sent; and

State that a claim against the LLC will be barred, unless a proceeding to enforce the claim is commenced within two (2) years after the publication of the notice.

If the dissolved LLC publishes a newspaper notice as provided in this subsection (c), the claim of each of the following claimants is barred, unless the claimant commences a proceeding to enforce the claim against the dissolved LLC within two (2) years after the publication date of the newspaper notice:

A claimant who did not receive written notice under subsection (b);

A claimant whose claim was timely sent to the dissolved LLC, but not acted on; or

A claimant whose claim is contingent, or based on an event occurring after the effective date of dissolution.

A claim may be enforced under this subsection (c):

Against the dissolved LLC, to the extent of its undistributed assets; or

If the assets have been distributed in liquidation, against a member or holder of financial rights of the dissolved LLC, to the extent of the member's or holder's pro rata share of the claim or the LLC assets distributed to the member or holder in liquidation, whichever is less, but a member's or holder's total liability for all claims under this subsection (c) may not exceed the total amount of assets distributed to the member or holder.

Effect of noncompliance. If the dissolved LLC does not comply with subsection (b) or (c), then claimants against the LLC not barred by this section may enforce their claims:

Against the dissolved LLC, to the extent of its undistributed assets; or

If the assets have been distributed in liquidation, against a member or holder of financial rights of the dissolved LLC to the extent of the member's or holder's pro rata share of the claim, or the LLC assets distributed to the member or holder in liquidation, whichever is less, but a member's or holder's total liability for all claims under this section may not exceed the total amount of assets distributed to the member or holder; provided, that a claim may not be enforced against a member or holder of a dissolved LLC who received a distribution in liquidation after three (3) years from the date of the filing of articles of termination.

Acts 2005, ch. 286, § 1; 2006, ch. 620, § 36.

Cross-References. Certified mail in lieu of registered mail, § 1-3-111.

48-249-612. Articles of termination.

When filed. Articles of termination shall be filed with the secretary of state upon the dissolution and the completion of winding up of the LLC.

Contents. Articles of termination shall set forth:

The name of the LLC;

The date of filing of its articles of organization;

The reason for the filing of the articles of termination;

Whether known and potential creditors and claimants have been notified of the dissolution under § 48-249-611; and

Any other information that the person filing the articles of termination determines necessary or desirable to include.

The secretary of state shall file the articles of termination if the secretary of state finds that the articles of termination:

Comply with subsection (b); and

Are accompanied by a tax clearance for termination or withdrawal relative to such LLC.

Acts 2005, ch. 286, § 1; 2010, ch. 741, § 42.

48-249-613. Revocation of dissolution.

When revocation permitted. In the case of dissolution by the members, as provided in § 48-249-601(a)(3), an LLC may revoke its dissolution at any time prior to the filing of the articles of termination with the secretary of state, except as provided in subsection (d).

Approval. Revocation of dissolution shall be authorized by the same vote of the members required to approve the dissolution, unless the authorization for dissolution permitted revocation by action by the board of directors or managers alone, as applicable, in which event the board of directors or managers, as applicable, may revoke the dissolution without member action.

Articles of revocation. After the revocation of dissolution is authorized, the LLC may revoke the dissolution, by filing articles of revocation of dissolution with the secretary of state, that set forth:

The name of the LLC;

The effective date of the dissolution that was revoked;

The date that the revocation of dissolution was authorized;

If the directors of a director-managed LLC or the managers of a manager-managed LLC revoked a dissolution authorized by the members, a statement that revocation was permitted by action by the board of directors or managers alone, as applicable, pursuant to that authorization; and

If member action was required to revoke the dissolution, a statement that the resolution was duly adopted by the members, and a copy of the resolution or the written consent authorizing the revocation of dissolution.

Revocation where LLC winding up by merger. If a dissolved LLC is being wound up and terminated by being merged into a successor entity under § 48-249-610(a), under an agreement or plan of merger under § 48-249-702, then the dissolution may be revoked under this section, only if the merger has been properly abandoned, as expressly provided for under § 48-249-702(k).

Acts 2005, ch. 286, § 1.

48-249-614. Effective date and effect of articles of termination.

When the articles of termination have been filed with the secretary of state, the existence of the LLC is terminated, except that the termination of the LLC existence shall not take away or impair any remedy of or against the LLC or its members, directors, managers or officers for any right or claim existing, or any liability incurred, prior to such termination. Any such action or proceeding by or against the LLC may be prosecuted or defended by the LLC in its LLC name. The members, directors, managers or officers, as applicable, shall have the power to take such LLC or other action, as may be appropriate, to protect such remedy, right or claim.

Acts 2005, ch. 286, § 1.

48-249-615. Supervised winding up and termination following a nonjudicial dissolution.

After an event of dissolution has occurred, and before articles of termination have been filed, the LLC or, for good cause shown, a member or creditor, may apply to a court within the county in which the LLC's principal executive office is or was last located to have the dissolution conducted or continued under the supervision of the court as provided in §§ 48-249-616 – 48-249-619.

Acts 2005, ch. 286, § 1.

48-249-616. Judicial intervention.

A court may grant any equitable relief it considers just and reasonable under the circumstances, may dissolve an LLC or may direct that the dissolved LLC be merged into another or new LLC or other entity, or otherwise be terminated, on the terms and conditions the court deems equitable.

Acts 2005, ch. 286, § 1.

48-249-617. Judicial dissolution and termination.

Judicial decree. On application by the attorney general and reporter, or by or for a member, the court may decree dissolution, winding up and termination of an LLC whenever it is not reasonably practicable to carry on the business in conformity with the LLC documents.

Effectiveness of dissolution. The dissolution is effective upon the decree of dissolution becoming final and nonappealable. Such decree shall be filed with the secretary of state and shall serve as a notice of dissolution.

Effectiveness of termination. The termination is effective upon a decree of termination becoming final and nonappealable. Such decree shall be filed with the secretary of state and shall serve and have the same effect as articles of termination.

Acts 2005, ch. 286, § 1.

48-249-618. Procedure for judicial dissolution and termination.

Venue. Venue for a proceeding by the attorney general and reporter to dissolve, wind up and terminate an LLC lies in Davidson County. Venue for a proceeding brought by any other person lies in the county where the LLC's principal executive office is or was last located.

Members not necessary parties. It is not necessary to make members parties to a proceeding to dissolve, wind up and terminate the existence of an LLC, unless relief is sought against them individually.

Remedies. A court, in a proceeding brought to dissolve, wind up and terminate an LLC, may issue injunctions, appoint a receiver or custodian pendente lite with all powers and duties the court directs, as provided in § 48-249-619, take other action required to preserve the LLC's assets, wherever located, and carry on the business of the LLC until a full hearing can be held.

Bond. In a proceeding for dissolution, winding up and termination of the existence of an LLC by a member, the petitioner shall execute and file a bond in the proceeding, with sufficient surety, to cover the defendant's probable costs, including reasonable attorney fees, in defending the petition. The court shall determine the amount of the bond and may award to any party its reasonable costs, including attorney fees, if it finds for such party in the proceeding.

Acts 2005, ch. 286, § 1.

48-249-619. Receivership or custodianship.

Judicial appointment. A court having equity jurisdiction in a judicial proceeding brought to dissolve, wind up and terminate the existence of an LLC may appoint one (1) or more receivers to wind up and liquidate, or one (1) or more custodians to manage the business and affairs of the LLC. The court shall hold a hearing, after notifying all parties to the proceeding and any interested persons designated by the court, before appointing a receiver or custodian. The court appointing a receiver or custodian has exclusive jurisdiction over the LLC and all of its property, wherever located.

Eligibility. The court may appoint an individual or a domestic or foreign entity, authorized to transact business in this state, as a receiver or custodian. The court may require the receiver or custodian to post bond, with or without sureties, in an amount the court directs.

Powers and Duties. The court shall describe the powers and duties of the receiver or custodian in its appointing order, which may be amended from time to time. Among other powers:

A receiver may:

Dispose of all or any part of the assets of the LLC, wherever located, at a public or private sale, if authorized by the court; and

Sue and defend in the receiver's own name, as receiver of the LLC, in all courts of this state; and

A custodian may exercise all of the powers of the LLC, through or in place of its members, board of directors, managers, or officers, as applicable, to the extent necessary to manage the affairs of the LLC in the best interests of its members, holders and creditors.

Combined functions. The court, during a receivership, may redesignate the receiver a custodian, and, during a custodianship, may redesignate the custodian a receiver, if doing so is in the best interests of the LLC and its members, holders and creditors.

Compensation. The court, from time to time during the receivership or custodianship, may order compensation paid and expense disbursements or reimbursements made to the receiver or custodian and the receiver's or custodian's counsel from the assets of the LLC or proceeds from the sale of the assets.

Acts 2005, ch. 286, § 1.

48-249-620. Disposition upon liquidation.

Distribution of Assets.

Upon the winding up of an LLC, the assets shall be distributed as follows:

First, to creditors, including members and holders of financial rights who are creditors, to the extent otherwise permitted by law, in satisfaction of liabilities of the LLC, whether by payment or the making of reasonable provisions for payment of such liabilities, other than liabilities:

For which reasonable provision for payment has been made; and

For distributions to members and holders of financial rights under § 48-249-305;

Second, to members, former members and holders of financial rights, in satisfaction of liabilities for distributions under § 48-249-305; and

Third, to members and holders of financial rights, first, for the return of their contributions that have not previously been returned, and, second, respecting the membership interests of members and the financial rights of holders of financial rights, as applicable, in the proportions in which the members and holders of financial rights, as applicable, share in distributions under § 48-249-305.

Any distributions in any form other than cash shall be subject to § 48-249-305(d).

Provisions for claims. An LLC that has dissolved shall pay, or make reasonable operating provision to pay, all claims and obligations, including all contingent, conditional or unmatured claims and obligations, known to the LLC, regardless of whether the identity of the claimant is known. If there are sufficient assets, such claims and obligations shall be paid in full, and any such provision for payment made shall be made in full. If there are insufficient assets, such claims and obligations shall be paid or provided for according to their priority, and, among claims and obligations of equal priority, ratably, to the extent of assets available for payment. Any remaining assets shall be distributed as provided in this chapter. Any receiver or custodian winding up an LLC's affairs who has complied with this section shall not be personally liable to the claimants of the dissolved LLC by reason of the receiver's or custodian's actions in winding up the LLC.

Debts incurred during winding up. All known contractual debts, obligations, and liabilities incurred in the course of winding up and terminating the LLC's affairs shall be paid or provided for by the LLC before the distribution of assets to a member or holder of financial rights. A person to whom this kind of debt, obligation, or liability is owed but not paid may pursue any remedy, before the expiration of the applicable statute of limitations, against the members, directors, managers or officers of the LLC, as applicable, who are responsible for, but who fail to cause, the LLC to pay or make provision for payment of the debts, obligations, and liabilities, or against members or holders of financial rights to the extent permitted under § 48-249-307. This subsection (c) does not apply to dissolution, winding up or termination of the existence of the LLC under the supervision or order of a court.

Acts 2005, ch. 286, § 1.

48-249-621. Omitted assets.

Title to assets remaining after payment of all debts, obligations, and liabilities, and after distributions to members and holders of financial rights, may be transferred by a court in this state.

Acts 2005, ch. 286, § 1.

48-249-622. Right to sue or defend after termination.

After the existence of an LLC has been terminated, any of its former managers, directors, officers or members may assert or defend, in the name of the LLC, any claim by or against the LLC.

Acts 2005, ch. 286, § 1.

48-249-623. Reinstatement within certain amount of time — Amendment of charter — Application for reinstatement.

A LLC that has been administratively dissolved by the expiration of its period of duration may reinstate within one (1) year of the expiration of the period of duration by:

Amending its articles of organization to extend its period of duration or set the period of duration to perpetual; and

Filing an application for reinstatement following administrative dissolution pursuant to § 48-249-606.

Acts 2016, ch. 688, § 12.